Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-168
Militia; active service; civil and criminal liability; immunity.

Members of the military forces ordered into the active service of the state by any proper authority shall not be liable, civilly or criminally, for any act or acts done by them while in the line of duty.

Laws 1909, c. 90, § 15, p. 371;

R.S.1913, § 3914;

C.S.1922, § 3323;

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 41, p. 668;

C.S.1929, § 55-150;

R.S.1943, § 55-183;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 66, p. 1603.